Utah statutes.
19-6-706.   Disposal of used oil -- Prohibitions.
(1) (a)  Except as authorized by the board or exempted in this section, a
person may not place, discard, or otherwise dispose of used oil:
(i)  in any solid waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility operated by a
political subdivision or a private entity, except as authorized for the
disposal of used oil that is hazardous waste under state law;
(ii)  in sewers, drainage systems, septic tanks, surface or ground waters,
watercourses, or any body of water; or
(iii)  on the ground.
(b)  A person who unknowingly disposes of used oil in violation of Subsection
(1)(a)(i) is not guilty of a violation of this section.
(2) (a)  A person may dispose of an item or substance that contains de minimis
amounts of oil in disposal facilities under Subsection (1)(a)(i) if:
(i)  to the extent reasonably possible all oil has been removed from the item
or substance; and
(ii)  no free flowing oil remains in the item or substance.
(b) (i)  A nonterne plated used oil filter complies with this section if it is
not mixed with hazardous waste and the oil filter has been gravity hot-drained
by one of the following methods:
(A)  puncturing the filter antidrain back valve or the filter dome end and
gravity hot-draining;
(B)  gravity hot-draining and crushing;
(C)  dismantling and gravity hot-draining; or
(D)  any other equivalent gravity hot-draining method that will remove used
oil from the filter at least as effectively as the methods listed in this
Subsection (2)(b)(i).
(ii)  As used in this Subsection (2), "gravity hot-drained" means drained for
not less than 12 hours near operating temperature but above 60 degrees
Fahrenheit.
(3)  A person may not mix or commingle used oil with the following substances,
except as incidental to the normal course of processing, mechanical, or
industrial operations:
(a)  solid waste that is to be disposed of in any solid waste treatment,
storage, or disposal facility, except as authorized by the board under this
chapter; or
(b)  any hazardous waste so the resulting mixture may not be recycled or used
for other beneficial purpose as authorized under this part.
(4) (a)  This section does not apply to releases to land or water of de
minimis quantities of used oil, except:
(i)  the release of de minimis quantities of used oil is subject to any
regulation or prohibition under the authority of the department; and
(ii)  the release of de minimis quantities of used oil is subject to any rule
made by the board under this part prohibiting the release of de minimis
quantities of used oil to the land or water from tanks, pipes, or other
equipment in which used oil is processed, stored, or otherwise managed by used
oil handlers, except wastewater under Subsection 19-6-708(2)(j).
(b)  As used in this Subsection (4), "de minimis quantities of used oil:"
(i)  means small spills, leaks, or drippings from pumps, machinery, pipes, and
other similar equipment during normal operations; and
(ii)  does not include used oil discarded as a result of abnormal operations
resulting in substantial leaks, spills, or other releases.
(5)  Used oil may not be used for road oiling, dust control, weed abatement,
or other similar uses that have the potential to release used oil in the
environment, except in compliance with Section 19-6-711 and board rule.
(6) (a) (i)  Facilities in existence on July 1, 1993, and subject to this
section may apply to the executive secretary for an extension of time beyond
that date to meet the requirements of this section.
(ii)  The executive secretary may grant an extension of time beyond July 1,
1993, upon a finding of need under Subsection (6)(b) or (c).
(iii)  The total of all extensions of time granted to one applicant under this
Subsection (6)(a) may not extend beyond January 1, 1995.
(b)  The executive secretary upon receipt of a request for an extension of
time may request from the facility any information the executive secretary
finds reasonably necessary to evaluate the need for an extension. This
information may include:
(i)  why the facility is unable to comply with the requirements of this
section on or before July 1, 1993;
(ii)  the processes or functions which prevent compliance on or before July 1,
1993;
(iii)  measures the facility has taken and will take to achieve compliance;
and
(iv)  a proposed compliance schedule, including a proposed date for being in
compliance with this section.
(c)  Additional extensions of time may be granted by the executive secretary
upon application by the facility and a showing by the facility that:
(i)  the additional extension is reasonably necessary; and
(ii)  the facility has made a diligent and good faith effort to comply with
this section within the time frame of the prior extension.
